Hawaii, session 2025, GM1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hanalei Bay is known
2 for its character as a quiet recreational area for families and
3 visitors to participate in ocean activities, including surfing,
4 swimming, paddle boarding, sailing, and kayaking. The
5 legislature further finds that there has been a growing increase
6 in the number of large vessels, including yachts and ships,
7 mooring in Hanalei Bay, posing a risk to the health and safety
8 of individuals and families participating in ocean activities in
9 the bay.
10 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to preserve the
11 quiet recreational character of Hanalei Bay and protect the
12 safety of residents and visitors who use the bay for water
13 activities by restricting the size of vessels permitted to enter
14 Hanalei Bay.
15 SECTION 2. Chapter 200, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
16 amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately
17 designated and to read as follows:
2025-3021 SB1511 HD2 HMSO

Page 2 S.B. NO. -1
H.D. 2
1 "§200- Hanalei Bay; vessel restrictions. No vessel more
2 than seventy-five feet in length shall enter Hanalei Bay waters,
3 the boundaries of which shall be defined by the board pursuant
4 to chapter 91; provided that this section shall not apply to
5 vessels operated by a federal, state, or county agency."
6 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
7 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3021 SB1511 HD2 HMSO 2

S.B. NO. S’,
H.L). 2
APPROVED this 2ncl day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 1511, S.D. 1,H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; April 23, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
0

SB No. 1511, SD 1,HD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives